windows/es.aff
SET ISO8859-1
TRY aersoinltcdmubpágízfvhéjqóñxyúükCMAIESPGJBRFTDVHUOwLKNZÁYXÜÓÚÉÑQWÍ

# -------------------------------------------------------------------------
# The affix file below is automatically generated from espa~nol.aff file by
# means of ispellaff2myspell script. Original copyright applies:
#
# Copyright (c) 1994 1995 1996 1999 2001 2005 2006 2008 2010 Santiago Rodriguez and Jesus Carretero
#
#    This program is free software; you can redistribute it and/or modify
#    it under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
#    the Free Software Foundation.
#
#    This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
#    but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
#    MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
#    GNU General Public License for more details. This software can be
#    obtained from http://www.datsi.fi.upm.es/~coes/
# -------------------------------------------------------------------------

SFX J Y 12
SFX J   e     ísimo       e
SFX J   e     ísimos      e
SFX J   e     ísima       e
SFX J   e     ísimas      e
SFX J   o     ísimo       o
SFX J   o     ísima       o
SFX J   o     ísimos      o
SFX J   o     ísimas      o
SFX J   0     ísimo       l
SFX J   0     ísima       l
SFX J   0     ísimos      l
SFX J   0     ísimas      l

SFX M Y 2
SFX M   o     amente      o
SFX M   0     mente       [aelnrsz]

SFX N Y 2
SFX N   r     damente     [ai]r
SFX N   er    idamente    er

SFX P Y 21
SFX P   e     a           e
SFX P   o     a           o
SFX P   0     s           [eo]
SFX P   o     as          o
SFX P   e     as          e
SFX P   z     ces         z
SFX P   án    ana         án
SFX P   án    anes        án
SFX P   án    anas        án
SFX P   ín    ina         ín
SFX P   ín    ines        ín
SFX P   ín    inas        ín
SFX P   ón    ona         ón
SFX P   ón    ones        ón
SFX P   ón    onas        ón
SFX P   0     a           [^aeons]
SFX P   0     es          [^aeonsz]
SFX P   0     as          [^aeons]
SFX P   és    esa         és
SFX P   és    eses        és
SFX P   és    esas        és

SFX H Y 2
SFX H   r     ción        [ai]r
SFX H   r     ciones      [ai]r

SFX I Y 4
SFX I   r     miento      [ai]r
SFX I   r     mientos     [ai]r
SFX I   er    imiento     er
SFX I   er    imientos    er

SFX L Y 6
SFX L   r     nte         ar
SFX L   r     ntes        ar
SFX L   er    iente       er
SFX L   er    ientes      er
SFX L   r     ente        ir
SFX L   r     entes       ir

SFX R Y 24
SFX R   0     me          [aei]r
SFX R   0     te          [aei]r
SFX R   0     se          [aei]r
SFX R   0     nos         [aei]r
SFX R   0     os          [aei]r
SFX R   ar    ándome      ar
SFX R   ar    ándote      ar
SFX R   ar    ándose      ar
SFX R   ar    ándonos     ar
SFX R   ar    ándoos      ar
SFX R   er    iéndome     er
SFX R   er    iéndote     er
SFX R   er    iéndose     er
SFX R   er    iéndonos    er
SFX R   er    iéndoos     er
SFX R   r     éndome      ir
SFX R   r     éndote      ir
SFX R   r     éndose      ir
SFX R   r     éndonos     ir
SFX R   r     éndoos      ir
SFX R   r     dme         [aeií]r
SFX R   r     dnos        [aeií]r
SFX R   r     os          [aeí]r
SFX R   ir    íos         ir

SFX r Y 12
SFX r   ar    émonos      [^czg]ar
SFX r   car   quémonos    car
SFX r   ar    uémonos     gar
SFX r   zar   cémonos     zar
SFX r   er    ámonos      [^cg]er
SFX r   cer   zámonos     cer
SFX r   ger   jámonos     ger
SFX r   ir    ámonos      [^cgu]ir
SFX r   cir   zámonos     cir
SFX r   gir   jámonos     gir
SFX r   uir   ámonos      guir
SFX r   quir  cámonos     quir

SFX t Y 72
SFX t   ar    émoslo      [^czg]ar
SFX t   ar    émosla      [^czg]ar
SFX t   ar    émosle      [^czg]ar
SFX t   ar    émoslos     [^czg]ar
SFX t   ar    émoslas     [^czg]ar
SFX t   ar    émosles     [^czg]ar
SFX t   car   quémoslo    car
SFX t   car   quémosla    car
SFX t   car   quémosle    car
SFX t   car   quémoslos   car
SFX t   car   quémoslas   car
SFX t   car   quémosles   car
SFX t   ar    uémoslo     gar
SFX t   ar    uémosla     gar
SFX t   ar    uémosle     gar
SFX t   ar    uémoslos    gar
SFX t   ar    uémoslas    gar
SFX t   ar    uémosles    gar
SFX t   zar   cémoslo     zar
SFX t   zar   cémosla     zar
SFX t   zar   cémosle     zar
SFX t   zar   cémoslos    zar
SFX t   zar   cémoslas    zar
SFX t   zar   cémosles    zar
SFX t   er    ámoslo      [^cg]er
SFX t   er    ámosla      [^cg]er
SFX t   er    ámosle      [^cg]er
SFX t   er    ámoslos     [^cg]er
SFX t   er    ámoslas     [^cg]er
SFX t   er    ámosles     [^cg]er
SFX t   cer   zámoslo     cer
SFX t   cer   zámosla     cer
SFX t   cer   zámosle     cer
SFX t   cer   zámoslos    cer
SFX t   cer   zámoslas    cer
SFX t   cer   zámosles    cer
SFX t   ger   jámoslo     ger
SFX t   ger   jámosla     ger
SFX t   ger   jámosle     ger
SFX t   ger   jámoslos    ger
SFX t   ger   jámoslas    ger
SFX t   ger   jámosles    ger
SFX t   ir    ámoslo      [^cgu]ir
SFX t   ir    ámosla      [^cgu]ir
SFX t   ir    ámosle      [^cgu]ir
SFX t   ir    ámoslos     [^cgu]ir
SFX t   ir    ámoslas     [^cgu]ir
SFX t   ir    ámosles     [^cgu]ir
SFX t   cir   zámoslo     cir
SFX t   cir   zámosla     cir
SFX t   cir   zámosle     cir
SFX t   cir   zámoslos    cir
SFX t   cir   zámoslas    cir
SFX t   cir   zámosles    cir
SFX t   gir   jámoslo     gir
SFX t   gir   jámosla     gir
SFX t   gir   jámosle     gir
SFX t   gir   jámoslos    gir
SFX t   gir   jámoslas    gir
SFX t   gir   jámosles    gir
SFX t   uir   ámoslo      guir
SFX t   uir   ámosla      guir
SFX t   uir   ámosle      guir
SFX t   uir   ámoslos     guir
SFX t   uir   ámoslas     guir
SFX t   uir   ámosles     guir
SFX t   quir  cámoslo     quir
SFX t   quir  cámosla     quir
SFX t   quir  cámosle     quir
SFX t   quir  cámoslos    quir
SFX t   quir  cámoslas    quir
SFX t   quir  cámosles    quir
