windows/es.dic
abombar/IOPQRSTVWXrt
acalorar/INOPQRSTVXrt
acelerar/HINOPQRSTVWXrt
acentuar/HNOPQRSTWXrt
aceptar/HLOPQRSTUVWXrtu
acercar/IOPQRSTUVWXrtu
achacoso/MPS
acicalar/IOPQRSTVWXrt
aclarador/PS
acompasar/NPQSTVWXt
acorralar/IOPQRSTVWXrt
aderezar/IPQSTVXt
adoctrinar/IPQSTVWXt
adoptar/LOPQRSTUVWXrtu
adorar/HOPQRSTVXrt
adquirir/LOQRTWXrt
afeminar/HINOPQRSTVWXrt
afrancesar/IOPQRSTVXrt
agraviar/ILPQSTVXt
agresivo/MPS
ahilar/IOPRSWXr
ahondar/IOPQRSTVXrt
airear/HOPQRSTVWXrt
ajustar/INOPQRSTUVWXrtu
alarmante/MS
alarmar/LOPQRSTVWXrt
alenguar/IPSWX
alimentar/HLOPQRSTVXrt
alocar/NOPQRSTVXrt
alto/JMPS
amínoralo/BDPS
amalgamar/HIOPQRSTVWXrt
ameritar/OPQRSTVWXrt
amigue/JS
amonestar/HILOPQRSTVXrt
amoratar/OPRSVWXr
anacrónico/MPS
andar/LORSWXr
anexionar/PQSTVXt
aniñar/NOPRSVWXr
antiquísimo/PS
apasionar/ILNOPQRSTVXrt
apegar/IOPRSVXr
aplacar/IOPQRSTVWXrt
apostillar/OPQRSTUVWXrtu
apremiante/MS
aprestar/OPQRSTVXrt
apretar/INOPQRSTWXrt
apuntar/HIOPQRSTUVWXrtu
arder/LVWX
arrítmico/PS
arrasar/IPQSTVWXt
arrebatar/INOPQRSTUVWXrtu
asaltar/LOPQRSTVWXrt
asegundar/PQSTVXt
asociar/HIOPQRSTUVXrtu
atontar/IOPQRSTVXrt
atropellar/INOPQRSTVWXrt
audaz/MS
augusto/MPS
automedicar/HOPRSVWXr
autorizar/HINOPQRSTVWXrt
avivar/IOPQRSTVWXrt
avocar/HIPSVX
ayudar/LOPQRSTVWXrt
baje/JPS
bajo/JPS
bastanteo/PS
batir/ILOQRTVWXrt
beato/JPS
bello/JMPS
benevolente/JS
besucar/PQSTVWXt
bobo/MPS
bono/JS
boyar/LPSVWX
bueno/JMPS
buitrear/PSVWX
canonizar/HPQSTVWXt
cansar/NOPQRSTVWXrt
caparídeo/PS
catolizar/OPQRSTVWXrt
causar/LOPQRSTVWXrt
cavilar/HPSVWX
cercano/MPS
cesto/PS
cierto/JMPS
cifrar/NOPQRSTVWXrt
claro/JMPS
cohesivo/PS
coligar/HIOPRSVWXr
colindar/LPSVX
colorear/OPQRSTVWXrt
combar/OPQRSTVWXrt
compilar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
completo/JMPS
condenar/HNOPQRSTVWXrt
condensar/HOPQRSTVXrt
condescender/LWX
condicionar/ILNOPQRSTVXrt
congraciar/IOPQRSTVXrt
consiguiente/MS
consonantizar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
contágialo/BDPS
contaminar/HLOPQRSTVWXrt
contender/LWX
contento/JPS
continuar/HNOPQRSTWXrt
corporizar/PQSTVWXt
costoso/JMPS
crepitar/HLPSVWX
crispar/HIOPQRSTVWXrt
cuatralbo/PS
culpabilizar/OPQRSTVWXrt
culpar/HNOPQRSTVWXrt
declarar/HLNOPQRSTUVWXrtu
decorativo/MPS
defoliar/HPQSTVXt
deformar/HLOPQRSTVWXrt
delatar/OPQRSTVWXrt
demudar/HIOPQRSTVWXrt
deprecar/HLPSVWX
derogar/HPQSTVXt
derrengar/OPQRSTVXrt
desacertar/NPSWX
desaderezar/OPQRSTVX
desaforar/NPSVX
desatar/OPQRSTVWXrt
descacharrar/LOPQRSTVWXrt
descargar/IOPQRSTVWXrt
descobijar/OPQRSTVWXrt
descolmillar/PSVWX
descompletar/PQSTVXt
desconcertar/LNOPQRSTWXrt
descongelar/HPQSTVXt
descubrir/IOQRTVWYrt
desengañar/OPQRSTVWXrt
desentonar/HIOPQRSTVXrt
desgaznatar/OPRSVWXr
desgraciar/NOPQRSTVXrt
deshílalo/BDPS
deshabitar/PQSTVWXt
desintegrar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
desmembrar/HOPQRSTWXrt
desoxigenar/HLPQSTVWXt
despachurrar/IPSVWX
desparramar/IOPQRSTVWXrt
despechar/NPSVWX
desplomar/OPQRSTVWXrt
desprivatizar/HPQSTVWXt
despulpar/PQSTVWXt
desudar/HPSVWX
desvincular/HOPQRSTVWXrt
detener/INOQRTWXoq
diligente/MS
diplomar/OPQRSTVWXrt
disentir/IWY
disgregar/HLOPQRSTVXrt
disgustoso/PS
disipar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
dopar/OPQRSTVWXrt
duro/JMPS
editar/OPQRSTUVWXrtu
electrizar/HLOPQRSTVWXrt
eliminar/HOPQRSTUVWXrtu
embancar/OPRSVWXr
empecinar/IOPRSVWXr
empequeñecer/IOQRTWXrt
empoltronecer/ORWXo
enajenar/HILOPQRSTVWXrt
enamorar/INOPQRSTVXrt
encarnizar/INOPQRSTVWXrt
encebadar/IPSVWX
encomendar/IOPQRSTWXrt
enconchar/OPRSVWXr
enfadar/IOPQRSTVWXrt
engañoso/MPS
enjuagar/OPQRSTVWXrt
enmallar/OPRSVWXr
enorme/JMS
enrasar/IPSVWX
entallecer/ORWXo
entiesar/PQSTVXt
entretener/IOQRTWXoq
entusiasmar/OPQRSTVWXrt
enumerar/HOPQRSTUVWXrtu
esblencar/PSVWX
escapar/OPRSVWXr
esconder/INOQRTVWXrt
espeluznar/ILPSVWX
esputar/OPQRSTVWXrt
estañar/PQSTVWXt
estar/HLORX
estercolar/IOPQRSTUVXrtu
estimable/MS
evacuar/HLOPQRSTUVXrtu
excelente/JMS
exceptuar/HOPQRSTUWXrtu
exculpar/HOPQRSTUVWXrtu
experto/MPS
expiatorio/PS
explosionar/PQSTVXt
exudar/HPSVWX
exultar/HLPSVWX
eyectar/OPQRSTVWXrt
felicitar/HOPQRSTUVWXrtu
femenino/MPS
fluidificar/HPQSTVWXt
fluir/NWY
fortificar/HLOPQRSTUVWXrtu
fotoeléctrico/MPS
frecuentar/HOPQRSTVXrt
fulminar/HLOPQRSTUVWXrtu
funcionar/IPSVX
fusilar/IOPQRSTVWXrt
gangrenoso/MPS
gemoso/MPS
glaciar/HS
gramatical/MS
grave/JMPS
guapo/JPS
hablar/LOPQRSTVWXrt
hispanizar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
homeopático/MPS
hurgón/PS
ideologizar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
ilegalizar/PQSTVWXt
importante/JS
importar/HLOPQRSTVXrt
impune/MS
incapacitar/HPQSTVWXt
inefable/MS
inmortalizar/OPQRSTVWXrt
innegable/MS
inspirar/HNOPQRSTVWXrt
insuflar/HPQSTVWXt
interconectar/OPQRSTUVWXrtu
interesar/LNOPQRSTVXrt
interlineal/MS
irreversible/MS
jabato/PS
lanzar/IOPQRSTUVWXrtu
largue/JS
lastrar/OPQRSTVWXrt
laxar/HILPSVWX
lento/JMPS
librar/HILOPQRSTVWXrt
licitar/HPQSTVWXt
limitado/JMPS
lloroso/MPS
maganzón/PS
magullar/IOPQRSTVWXrt
mal/JPS
malquerer/LVX
materializar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
merecer/INOQRTUWXoqz
metafórico/MPS
mismo/JMPS
mixtificar/HPQSTVWXt
moler/ILQTWX
monográfico/PS
motivar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
municionar/IPSVX
notificar/HOPQRSTUVWXrtu
nove/JPS
obligar/HNOPQRSTVWXrt
obsequioso/MPS
obsesionar/LOPRSVXr
optimizar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
osar/NPQSTVWXt
péinalo/BDPS
pacer/LVX
parodiar/PQSTVXt
patético/MPS
pequeño/JPS
pertenecer/LWX
plausivo/PS
polvorear/IPSVWX
postrar/HOPRSVXr
potente/MS
precisar/OPQRSTVWXrt
preinscribir/OQRTUVWYrtu
preocupar/HLNOPQRSTVWXrt
pringar/OPQRSTVWXrt
pronto/JMPS
psíquico/MPS
puntuar/HOPQRSTUWXrtu
quebrar/ILOPQRSTWXrt
radiotécnico/PS
raro/JMPS
realimentar/HPQSTVXt
rebajar/IOPQRSTUVWXrtu
recatar/NPSVWX
redactar/OPQRSTUVWXrtu
refutar/HPQSTVWXt
regalar/INOPQRSTUVWXrtu
reglar/PQSTVWXt
regrabar/OPQRSTUVWXrtu
remilgar/NOPRSVWXr
renunciar/HILPQSTVXt
reprochar/OPQRSTVWXrt
restriñir/I
retener/INOQRTUWXoqz
retrasar/OPQRSTVWXrt
revacunar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
reverberar/HPSVWX
reverendo/JPS
rico/MPS
saturnio/PS
sentar/IOPQRSTUWXrtu
sentir/INOQWYoq
sereno/JMPS
severo/MPS
significar/HLOPQRSTVWXrt
situar/HOPQRSTWXrt
sobrar/LNPSVWX
subdelegar/HLPSVX
sumare/JPS
surtir/IOQRTVWXrt
sustitúyelo/BPS
sutil/MS
tallar/PQSTVWXt
tarde/JPS
tender/LOQRTWXrt
trabar/IOPQRSTVWXrt
transversal/MS
traspasar/HIOPQRSTUVWXrtu
traspirar/HOPRSVWXr
triplicar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
trocar/INOPQRSTWXrt
tunar/LPSVWX
valioso/JPS
virtuoso/MPS
zapuzar/PSVWX
zonificar/HPQSTVWXt
